Illinois, session 104th, HB3046.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Universities Civil Service Act is 5amended by adding Section 36t as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 70/36t new)7    Sec. 36t. Enhancement of employee rights permitted. 8Nothing in this Act or any rules adopted under this Act 9prevents the parties to a collective bargaining agreement 10subject to the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act from 11agreeing to a provision that enhances employee rights. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.